Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1405.01
Initiative and referendum measures; informational pamphlet; contents; distribution.

(1) The Secretary of State shall develop and print one informational pamphlet on all initiative and referendum measures to be placed on the ballot. The pamphlet shall include the measure number, the ballot title and text, and the full text of each initiated or referred measure and arguments both for and against each measure.

(2) The Secretary of State shall write the arguments for and against each measure, and each set of arguments shall consist of no more than two hundred fifty words. Information for the arguments may be provided by the sponsors of the measure, opponents to the measure, and other sources.

(3) The Secretary of State shall distribute the pamphlets to election commissioners and county clerks at least six weeks prior to the election. The election commissioners and county clerks shall immediately make the pamphlets available in their offices and in at least three other public locations that will facilitate distribution to the public.

Laws 1995, LB 337, § 7.